District of Columbia statutes.
26-909

Penalty provisions in contracts prohibited.

In any contract made in pursuance of the provisions of this chapter it shall be unlawful to incorporate any provision for liquidated or other damages as a penalty for any default or forfeiture thereunder.

Feb. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 660, ch. 26, § 9
1981 Ed., § 26-709.
1973 Ed., § 26-609.